Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 7 REGIONAL SERVICE AUTHORITIES
32-7-113. General powers.

The service authority shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, and the board has the following general powers:

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings; the provisions of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", as set forth in article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., shall be applicable to any service authority formed under this article;

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the service authority and to accept all funds resulting therefrom pursuant to the provisions and limitations of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.;

To contract with private persons, associations, or corporations for the provision of any service within or without its boundaries and to accept all funds and obligations resulting therefrom;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and other obligations and to evidence the same by certificates, notes, or debentures and to issue general obligation or revenue bonds, or any combinations thereof, in accordance with the provisions of this article;

To refund any bonded or other indebtedness or special obligations of the service authority without an election in accordance with the provisions and limitations of this article;

To acquire, dispose of, and encumber real and personal property, including, without limitation, rights and interests in property, including leases and easements, necessary to accomplish the purposes of the service authority;

To acquire, construct, equip, operate, and maintain facilities to accomplish the purposes of the service authority;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business affairs and properties of the service authority and in any case in which it acquires two or more facilities, the authority may use differential prices which reflect differential equities, liabilities, and operating costs for not exceeding thirty years;

To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, attorneys, and financial or other consultants and to provide for the powers, duties, qualifications, and terms of tenure thereof;

To have and exercise the powers of eminent domain to take any private property necessary to the exercise of the powers granted, both within and without the service authority, in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use;

To construct, establish, and maintain works and facilities in, across, or along any easement dedicated to a public use, or any public street, road, or highway, subject to the provisions of section 32-7-116, and in, upon, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are now, or may become, the property of the state of Colorado, and to construct, establish, and maintain works and facilities in, across, or along any stream of water or watercourse;

To provide for the revenues and ad valorem taxes needed to finance the service authority, subject to the limitations of this article, to fix and from time to time increase or decrease, and collect rates, fees, tolls, and other service charges pertaining to the services of the service authority, including without limitation minimum charges and charges for availability of the facilities or services relating thereto; to pledge such revenues for the payment of securities; and to enforce the collection of such revenues by civil action or by any other means authorized by law;

To levy, collect, and cause to be collected ad valorem taxes and other revenues, including rates, fees, tolls, and charges, fixed within the boundaries of any special taxing district within the service authority as provided in this article;

To levy, collect, and cause to be collected special assessments fixed against specially benefited real property in any improvement district within the service authority as provided in this article;

To adopt and amend bylaws setting forth rules of procedure for the conduct of its affairs and providing for the administrative organization and structure, including provisions for delegation of powers and functions of the service authority, consistent with section 17 of article XIV of the state constitution and with this article;

To adopt by resolution, and enforce, pursuant to section 32-7-115, regulations not inconsistent with state law which are necessary, appropriate, or incidental to any authorized service provided by the service authority;

To plan for the territory within the service authority, including the review of all comprehensive plans of local governments located within the boundaries of the service authority;

To review all capital construction or other federal grant-in-aid projects proposed by any local governmental entity within the boundaries of the service authority and for which review is required by federal or state law;

To appoint citizen advisory committees to assist and advise with respect to services and powers of the service authority;

To accept on behalf of the service authority gifts, grants, and conveyances upon such terms and conditions as the board may approve;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the powers granted in this article.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 463, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-13.

32-7-114. Duties related to planning powers.

To provide for comprehensive planning to promote the orderly and efficient development of the physical, social, and economic elements of the service authority and to encourage and assist local governments within the boundaries of the service authority to plan for the future, the board shall prepare and adopt, after such public hearings as it deems necessary, a comprehensive development guide for the service authority area, consisting of a compilation of policy statements, goals, standards, programs, maps, and those future developments that will have an impact on the entire area, including but not limited to such matters as land use, parks and open space land needs, transportation facilities, public hospitals and health facilities, libraries, schools, other public buildings, domestic water collection, treatment, and distribution, housing, and the delivery and distribution of social services to residents of the service authority.

The board shall review all comprehensive plans of each commission, board, or agency of the state of Colorado, or any local government within the service authority area, if such plan is determined by the board to affect the development of the service authority. Each such plan shall be submitted to the board for such determination before any action is taken, and, if the board finds that a plan or any part thereof is inconsistent with its comprehensive development guide for the service authority area, is detrimental to the orderly and economic development of the authority's area, or will cause inefficient or uneconomic delivery of services to inhabitants of the area, it shall, within sixty days after the filing of the plan with the service authority, notify the respective state agency or local government of noncompliance with the regional plan. If no agreement can be obtained between the board and a state agency or local government within ninety days after such notice of noncompliance, the board shall indicate the noncompliance of any such plan on the service authority's comprehensive development guide, and said plan shall take effect.

The board shall review all applications of any local government in the service authority area for a loan or grant from a state or federal agency if review by a regional or areawide agency is required by federal law, by the federal agency, or by state law. Each commission, board, or agency, before submitting such application to the United States, or any agency thereof, or to the state, or any agency thereof, shall first transmit the application to the board of the service authority for its comments and recommendations with respect to whether or not the project proposed is consistent with the comprehensive development guide for the service authority area. The comments and recommendations made by the board of the service authority shall then become a part of the application, and if submitted to a state or federal agency such comments and recommendations shall also be submitted. If the board of the service authority fails to report its comments and recommendations within sixty days, the local government may forward its grant application to the appropriate agency of the state or the United States government. If, however, the local government shall forward its application to the appropriate agency of the state or the United States government after said sixty days have lapsed without obtaining the review by the service authority of its application, it shall state upon said application that it was not reviewed by the service authority acting in its capacity as the regional or areawide agency.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 465, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-14.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 670, § 8, effective June 1.

32-7-115. Ancillary powers.

The board of any service authority has the power to adopt by resolution and enforce regulations not inconsistent with state law or regulations which are necessary, appropriate, or incidental to any authorized services provided by the service authority.

Said regulations shall be compiled and kept by the secretary so as to be readily available for public inspection and shall be enforced by the peace officers of any municipality or county located within or partly within the boundaries of the service authority.

Violations of such regulations shall be prosecuted by the district attorney or other person designated by the board in the county court of the county in which the violation occurred and shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding three hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 466, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-15.

32-7-116. Powers to be exercised without franchise - condition.

The board has authority, without the necessity of a franchise, to cut into or excavate and use any easements dedicated to a public use, or any public street, road, or highway pursuant to the construction, maintenance, or provision of any service authorized to be provided by the service authority.

The legislative body or other authority having jurisdiction over any such public street, road, or highway has authority to make such reasonable rules as it deems necessary in regard to any such work or use, and may require the payment of such reasonable fees by the service authority as may be fixed by said body to insure proper restoration of such streets, roads, or highways.

When any such fee is paid by the service authority, it shall be the responsibility of the legislative body or other authority to promptly restore such street, road, or highway. If such fee is not fixed or paid, the service authority shall promptly restore any such street, road, or highway to its former condition, as nearly as possible.

In the course of such construction, the service authority shall not impair the normal use of any street, road, or highway more than is reasonably necessary.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 466, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-16.

32-7-117. Revenues of service authority - collection.

In any service authority, all rates, fees, tolls, and charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the property served until paid, and any such lien may be enforced and foreclosed by certification of the delinquent amounts due, within one hundred twenty days after the due date of such rates, fees, tolls, or charges, to the board of county commissioners of the county in which said property is located. The officials of said county shall collect and remit such delinquent amounts to the service authority in the manner provided by law for the collection of general property taxes.

The board may discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, fees, tolls, or charges or in the payment of taxes levied pursuant to this article and shall prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for the connection with and the disconnection from the facilities of the service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 466, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-17.

32-7-118. Levy and collection of taxes.

To provide for the levy and collection of taxes, the board shall determine, in each year, the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the service authority, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the service authority and together with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the service authority annually to supply funds for paying the expenses of organization and the costs of constructing, operating, and maintaining the service authority and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of the service authority payable from taxes, and, in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 32-7-119. The authority of the board under this section and section 32-7-113 (1)(m) is subject to mill levy limitations provided in this article; but, if the board determines that the maximum mill levy authorized under this article is insufficient to support any service of the district, the board may submit the question of an increased mill levy authorization to the eligible electors of the service authority at the next regular election of the authority.

The board may apply a portion of such taxes and other revenues for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet the obligations of the service authority for maintenance, operating expenses, depreciation, and extension and improvement of the facilities of the service authority.

The board, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the service authority, or having a portion of its territory within the service authority, the rate so fixed, in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property which is located within the county and the service authority.

All taxes levied under this article, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general ad valorem taxes.

Property taxes provided for in this article shall be levied, assessed, collected, remitted, and accounted for in the manner provided for other general ad valorem taxes.

The board may accept on behalf of the service authority any state-collected, locally-shared taxes of whatever nature or kind if such taxes are approved and enacted by the general assembly.

The board has the power to deposit or to invest surplus funds in the manner and form it determines to be most advantageous; but said deposits or investments must meet the requirements and limitations of part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

The board has the power to accept on behalf of the service authority all funds tendered it from the state, the federal government, or any political subdivision or agency of either, which funds are specifically intended as incentive to, or assistance in, the formation, operation, or extension of service authority activities.

No service authority shall levy a tax for the entire authority or for any special taxing district or special assessment district for the calendar year during which it shall have been formed unless, prior to the date specified by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., for certification of the rate of levy for such year, the assessor and board of county commissioners of each county within the service authority have received from the board a map and a legal description of such service authority, special taxing district, or special assessment district and a copy of a budget of such service authority or district as provided by section 29-1-113, C.R.S., and increased property tax levies shall be subject to the provisions of section 29-1-301, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 467, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-18.

L. 77:

(3) and (9) amended, p. 1512, § 75, effective July 15.

L. 79:

(7) amended, p. 1625, § 39, effective June 8.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1353, § 30, effective April 30.

L. 90:

(9) amended, p. 1436, § 5, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 901, § 147, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-119. Levies to cover deficiencies.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contract, maturing bonds and interest on bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the service authority, are not sufficient to pay punctually the annual installments on its contracts or bonds, and interest thereon, and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and such taxes shall continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the service authority is fully paid.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 468, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-19.

32-7-120. Power to issue revenue bonds - terms.

To carry out the purposes of this article, the board is authorized to issue negotiable coupon bonds payable solely from the revenues derived, or to be derived, from the facility or combined facilities of the service authority. The terms, conditions, and details of said bonds, the procedures related thereto, and the refunding thereof shall be substantially the same as those provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., relating to water and sewer revenue bonds; except that the purposes for which the same may be issued shall not be so limited. Revenue bonds issued under this article shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or other provision. Each bond issued under this section shall recite in substance that said bond, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged for the payment thereof and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the service authority within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or provisions. Such revenue bonds may be issued to mature at such time, not exceeding the estimated life of the facility to be acquired with the bond proceeds, as determined by the board, but in no event beyond thirty years from their respective dates.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 468, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-20.

32-7-121. Power to incur indebtedness - interest - maturity - denominations.

To carry out the purposes of this article, the board is authorized to issue general obligation negotiable coupon bonds of the service authority. Said bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of said bonds does not exceed that maximum net effective interest rate authorized, and shall be due and payable serially, either annually or semiannually, commencing not later than three years and extending not more than thirty years from the date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their payment and redemption, shall be determined by the board. If the board so determines, said bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity with or without payment of a premium, not exceeding three percent of the principal thereof. In any event, said bonds shall be subject to call not later than fifteen years from date. Said bonds shall be executed in the name and on behalf of the service authority and signed by the chairman of the board with the seal of the service authority affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Said bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, and the bonds and coupons thereto attached shall be payable to bearer. Interest coupons shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the president of the board.

Bonds voted for different purposes by separate propositions submitted at the same or different bond elections may, at the discretion of the board, be combined and issued as a single issue of bonds so long as the security therefor is the same.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 469, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-21.

32-7-122. Debt question submitted to electors - resolution.

Whenever the board determines by resolution that the interest of the service authority and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction, installation, or completion of any works or other improvements or facilities or the making of any contract to carry out the objects or purposes of the service authority which requires the creation of any indebtedness of the service authority, the board shall order the submission of the proposition of incurring such indebtedness to the eligible electors of the service authority at an election held for that purpose. Any election may be held separately or may be held jointly or concurrently with any other election authorized by this article.

The declaration of public interest or necessity required and the provision for the holding of the election may be included within one and the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to the declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the works or improvements, as the case may be, the principal amount of the indebtedness to be incurred, and the maximum net effective interest rate to be paid on the indebtedness. The resolution shall also fix the date upon which the election shall be held and shall appoint a designated election official to conduct the election as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

In accordance with the provisions of section 6 (3) of article XI of the state constitution, general obligation debts contracted by a service authority for the purpose of supplying water shall be exempted from the provisions of this section.

Local improvement bonds issued pursuant to section 32-7-135 shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of this section and section 6 of article XI of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 469, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-22.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1354, § 31, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 901, § 148, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-123. Effect - subsequent elections.

If any proposition authorized by section 32-7-122 is approved by the eligible electors, the service authority shall thereupon be authorized to incur the indebtedness or obligations, enter into contracts, or issue and sell bonds of the service authority, as the case may be, all for the purposes and objects provided for in the proposition submitted under this section, in the amount so provided, and at a price and at a rate of interest such that the maximum net effective interest rate recited in the resolution is not exceeded. Submission of the proposition of incurring the obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent elections called for any legal purpose, but no new election creating an indebtedness may be held within one hundred twenty days after the date of the election at which a proposal was defeated. No more than two elections may be held within any twelve-month period.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-23.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 902, § 149, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-124. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this article, if the court or the board reviewing the proceedings finds for any reason that due notice was not given, said body shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceedings in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but said body shall order due notice to be given, shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice is properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-24.

32-7-125. Refunding bonds.

Any general obligation bonds issued by any service authority may be refunded without an election by the service authority issuing them, or by any successor thereof, in the name of the service authority which issued the bonds being refunded, but subject to provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto, by the issuance of bonds to refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of such outstanding bonds, including any interest on said bonds in arrears or about to become due, and for the purpose of avoiding or terminating any default in the payment of interest on and principal of said bonds, reducing interest costs or effecting other economies, or modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional bonds or to any system appertaining thereto or for any combination of the foregoing purposes. Refunding bonds may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds refunded or may be sold as provided in this article for an original issue of bonds.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-25.

32-7-126. Limitations upon issuance.

No general obligation or revenue bonds may be refunded unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment, or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. Provision shall be made for paying the bonds refunded within said period of time. No maturity of any bond refunded may be extended over fifteen years. The interest rate on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the board. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded, except to the extent any interest on the bonds refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of refunding bonds. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the bonds being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for the payment of the refunded bonds.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 470, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-26.

32-7-127. Use of proceeds of refunding bonds.

The proceeds of refunding general obligation or revenue bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds being refunded or be placed in escrow in any state or national bank within the state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation to be applied to the payment of the bonds being refunded upon their presentation therefor; but, to the extent any incidental expenses have been capitalized, such refunding bond proceeds may be used to defray such expenses, and any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding bonds may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon and the principal thereof, or both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the board may determine. Any such escrow shall not necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding bonds but may include other moneys available for the escrow's purpose. Any moneys in escrow, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such moneys and investments in escrow, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom to pay the bonds being refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at any designated prior redemption date or dates in connection with which the board shall exercise a prior redemption option. Any purchaser of any refunding bond issued under sections 32-7-125 and 32-7-126 and this section shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the service authority or any of its officers, agents, or employees.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-27.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1119, § 39, effective July 1.

32-7-128. Combination of refunding and other bonds.

General obligation bonds for refunding and general obligation bonds for any purpose authorized in this article may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more by any service authority. Revenue bonds for refunding and revenue bonds for any purpose authorized in this article may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more by any service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-28.

32-7-129. Board's determination final.

The determination of the board that the limitations under sections 32-7-125 to 32-7-128 imposed upon the issuance of refunding bonds have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or unless it can be shown that the board acted in an arbitrary or capricious manner.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-29.

32-7-130. Anticipation warrants.

The board may defray any costs of the service authority by the issuance of notes or warrants to evidence the amount due therefor, in anticipation of taxes or revenues or both. Interest on such notes or warrants shall be governed by the provisions of section 5-12-104, C.R.S. Notes and warrants may mature at such time not exceeding one year from their date of issuance as the board may determine. If such notes or warrants are not paid during the fiscal year in which they are issued, the board shall, at the end of its fiscal year, budget the amount necessary to pay in full the amount of notes and warrants outstanding and due during the next fiscal year.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 471, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-30.

32-7-131. Inclusion - counties - municipality - existing service authority - procedures.

Proceedings for inclusion of an additional county, counties, or a municipality which has territory in two or more counties in a service authority shall be in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Inclusion of any county, counties, or a municipality specified in subsection (1) of this section may be initiated by:

A petition signed by eligible electors in the respective county, counties, or municipality seeking to be included, in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the county, counties, or municipality for the office of governor at the last preceding general election;

A resolution adopted by the municipality or by a majority of the county commissioners in the county or counties; or

A resolution of a majority of the governing bodies of the municipalities within the territory of the county or counties seeking to be included.

Proceedings for inclusion shall be commenced by filing a verified petition or resolution with the board of directors of the service authority naming the county, counties, or municipality to be included, and shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the proceedings as estimated by the board. Additional deposits may be required from time to time should the original deposit be deemed by the board to be insufficient to pay all the costs.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of a hearing on the petition to be published throughout the county or municipality. The notice shall also be mailed to the governing body of each county and the municipalities within the county, and to any municipality specified in subsection (1) of this section. The notice shall describe the nature of the petition and the purpose, date, time, and place of the hearing.

At the hearing and any continuation thereof, all petitioners and county or municipal officials and any eligible elector of the service authority or of the territory proposed for inclusion shall be interested parties and may present evidence for or against the petition.

Upon completion of the hearing, the board shall make the following determinations which shall be final, conclusive, and not subject to review except upon the grounds that the same are arbitrary or capricious:

Whether the petition or resolution and all subsequent notices and proceedings comply with all of the requirements of this section;

Whether the petition has been signed by the requisite number of eligible electors or whether the resolution was approved by the requisite number of the members of the board of county commissioners or members of the governing body or bodies of municipalities within the county having the proper qualifications; and

Whether the granting of the petition or resolution, in whole or in part, is in the public interest and the interest of the service authority.

Having made such determinations, the board by resolution shall grant or deny the petition or resolution, in whole or in part, as follows:

If any of the determinations required by subsection (5) of this section are in the negative, the board shall deny the petition or resolution.

If all of the determinations required by subsection (5) of this section are in the affirmative, the board shall order the question of including said county, counties, or municipality within the service authority to be submitted at a general or special county or municipal election, as the case may be, to a vote of the eligible electors of the county, counties, or municipality. The resolution shall name a designated election official who shall be responsible for the conducting of the election. The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. If the inclusion is approved at the election, the board shall, by resolution, grant the petition, in whole or in part as the case may be, and shall file a true and correct copy of its resolution with the clerk of the district court which had jurisdiction over the initial formation of the service authority and with the board of county commissioners and assessor of the county and the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

The district court or the director of the division of local government shall enter an order of inclusion of the county or municipality, as the case may be, in the service authority, which order shall finally and conclusively establish such inclusion against all persons except the state of Colorado, in an action in the nature of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within thirty-five days after the adoption of the resolution and not otherwise. The inclusion of the county in the service authority shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this section.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 472, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-31.

L. 76:

(6)(b) and (7) amended, p. 603, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a)(I), (4), and (6)(b) amended, p. 1354, § 32, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(2) to (7) amended, p. 902, § 150, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2012:

(7) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 882, § 150, effective July 1.

32-7-132. Special taxing districts authorized.

In accordance with the provisions of section 18 of article XIV of the state constitution, the board of a service authority may establish special taxing districts within the service authority to facilitate the furnishing of services and the collection of ad valorem taxes and charges for such services.

Such special taxing districts shall be utilized when a service or level of service which a service authority is authorized to provide is to be provided in substantially less than the entire area included within the service authority, and where resulting ad valorem taxes or charges may vary from those imposed in other areas within the service authority.

As long as the service is available to the included territory, a special taxing district may include any territory within a service authority. The included territory need not be contiguous, and the same territory may lie within more than one special taxing district.

In the management of a special taxing district, the board of the service authority shall have all powers granted to the board by this article.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 473, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-32.